Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated to the Department of Agriculture for a grant to CelluComp to support the commercialization of an innovative material additive that enables the production of fiber-based barrier packaging to reduce perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and plastics in packaging products. This is a onetime appropriation and available until July 1, 2027. new text end